Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 9. General Provisions.

Sec. 34.03.320.
Obligation of good faith.

Every duty under this chapter and every act that must be performed as a condition precedent to the exercise of a right or remedy under this chapter imposes an obligation of good faith in its performance or enforcement.
The aggrieved party has a duty to mitigate damages.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)

Sec. 34.03.330.
Application and exclusions.

This chapter applies to and determines rights, obligations and remedies under a rental agreement, wherever made, for a dwelling unit in this state.

Unless created to avoid the application of this chapter, the following arrangements are not governed by this chapter:

residence at an institution, public or private, if incidental to detention or the provision of medical, geriatric, educational, counseling, religious, or similar services;

occupancy under a contract of sale of a dwelling unit or the property of which it is a part if the occupant is the purchaser or a person who succeeds to the interest of a purchaser;

occupancy by a member of a fraternal or social organization in the portion of a structure operated for the benefit of the organization;

transient occupancy in a hotel, motel, lodgings, or other transient facility;

occupancy by an employee of a landlord whose right to occupancy is conditioned upon employment substantially for services, maintenance, or repair to the premises;

occupancy by an owner of a condominium unit or a holder of a proprietary lease in a cooperative;

occupancy under a rental agreement covering premises used by the occupant primarily for agricultural purposes;

occupancy under a rental agreement covering premises used as part of a transitional or supportive housing program that is sponsored or operated by a public corporation or by a nonprofit corporation and that provides shelter and related support services intended to improve the occupant’s opportunity to obtain permanent housing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974; am § 32 ch 121 SLA 1994)

Sec. 34.03.335.
Proof of certain property damage claims.

In an action initiated by a party to recover damages or to obtain other relief to which a party may be entitled under this chapter, a premises condition statement and contents inventory prepared under AS

34.03.020(e)

is presumptive evidence of the condition of the premises and its contents at the commencement of the term of the period of occupancy covered by the rental agreement between the parties. Unless its authenticity is rebutted by clear and convincing evidence by the party against whom the statement and contents inventory is offered, the statement and contents inventory may be offered by a party, without additional supporting evidence, as the basis on which to compute the recovery of damages to which the party may be entitled under this chapter.

History.

(§ 33 ch 121 SLA 1994)

Sec. 34.03.340.
Service of process.

If a landlord is not a resident of this state or is a corporation not authorized to do business in this state and engages in any conduct in this state governed by this chapter, or engages in a transaction subject to this chapter, the landlord may designate an agent upon whom service of process may be made in this state.
The agent shall be a resident of this state or a corporation authorized to do business in this state.
The agent shall be the same person designated under AS

34.03.080

.
The designation shall be in writing and filed with the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development.
If no designation is made and filed or if process cannot be served in this state upon the designated agent, process may be served upon the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development, but the service upon the commissioner is not effective unless the plaintiff or petitioner immediately mails a copy of the process and pleadings by certified or registered mail to the defendant or respondent at the last ascertainable address of the defendant or respondent.
An affidavit of compliance with this section shall be filed with the clerk of the court having jurisdiction on or before the return day for the process, if any, or within any further time allowed by the court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 34.03.345.
Mediation and binding arbitration.

A landlord and a tenant may agree to mediate disputes between them as to an obligation of either of them arising out of the rental agreement. If the landlord and tenant agree to mediate disputes, they shall include the scope of the agreement within the executed rental agreement, incorporate a reference to that agreement within the rental agreement, or add the text of the agreement as a separate attachment to the rental agreement.

A landlord and a tenant may agree to binding arbitration of the disputes between them as to an obligation of either of them arising out of the rental agreement. If the landlord and tenant agree to binding arbitration, they shall include the scope of the agreement within the executed rental agreement, incorporate a reference to that agreement within the rental agreement, or add the text of the agreement as a separate attachment to the rental agreement.

History.

(§ 34 ch 121 SLA 1994)

Sec. 34.03.350.
Attorney fees.

Attorney fees shall be allowed to the prevailing party in any proceeding arising out of this chapter or a rental agreement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)

Sec. 34.03.360.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“abandonment” means that the tenant has left the dwelling unit and the tenant’s personal belongings in it and has been absent for a continuous period of seven days or longer without giving notice under AS

34.03.150

and has defaulted in the payment of rent;

“building and housing codes” include any law, ordinance, or governmental regulation concerning fitness for habitation, or the construction, maintenance, operation, occupancy, use, or appearance of a premise or dwelling unit;

“dwelling unit” means a structure or a part of a structure that is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one person who maintains a household or by two or more persons who maintain a common household, and includes mobile homes, and if located in a mobile home park, the lot or space upon which a mobile home is placed;

“fair rental value” means the average rental rate in the community for available dwelling units of similar size and features;

“good faith” means honesty in fact in the conduct of the transaction concerned;

“illegal activity involving alcoholic beverages” means a person’s delivery of an alcoholic beverage in violation of AS

04.11.010(b)

in an area where the results of a local option election have, under AS

04.11.491

, prohibited the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board from issuing, renewing, or transferring a liquor license or permit under AS 04;

“illegal activity involving a controlled substance” means a violation of AS

11.71.010(a)

,

11.71.021

,

11.71.030(a)(2)

or (9), or

11.71.040(a)(1)

, (2), or (5);

“illegal activity involving gambling or promoting gambling” means a violation of

AS

11.66.200

, other than a social game as that term is defined by AS

11.66.280

(10); and

AS

11.66.210

or

11.66.220

;

“illegal activity involving an imitation controlled substance” means a violation of AS

11.73.010

—

11.73.030

;

“illegal activity involving a place of prostitution” means a violation of AS

11.66.120(a)(1)

or

11.66.130(a)(2)(A)

or (D);

“landlord” means the owner, lessor, or sublessor of the dwelling unit or the building of which it is a part, and it also means a manager of the premises who fails to disclose as required by AS

34.03.080

;

“mobile home” has the meaning given to “manufactured home” in AS

45.29.102

;

“organization” includes a corporation, government, governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, two or more persons having a joint or common interest, and any other legal entity;

“owner” means one or more persons, jointly or severally, in whom is vested all or part of the legal title to property or all or part of the beneficial ownership of property and a right to present use of the premises; the term includes a mortgagee in possession;

“premises” means a dwelling unit and the structure of which it is a part and facilities and appurtenances in it and grounds, areas, and facilities held out for the use of tenants generally or whose use is promised to the tenant;

“prepaid rent” means that amount of money demanded by the landlord at the initiation of the tenancy for the purpose of ensuring that rent will be paid, but does not include the first month’s rent or money received as security for damage;

“prostitution” means an act in violation of AS

11.66.100

;

“rent” means the uniform periodic payment due the landlord, however denominated;

“rental agreement” means all agreements, written or oral, and valid rules and regulations adopted under AS

34.03.130

embodying the terms and conditions concerning the use and occupancy of a dwelling unit and premises;

“sanitary facility” means a flush toilet and proper drainage for all toilets, sinks, basins, bathtubs, and showers;

“single family residence” means a structure maintained and used as a single dwelling unit;

“tenant” means a person entitled under a rental agreement to occupy a dwelling unit to the exclusion of others;

“undeveloped rural area” means an area where public sewer or water services are not available.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974; am § 62 ch 21 SLA 1991; am §§ 35, 37 ch 121 SLA 1994; am § 67 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 24 ch 64 SLA 2012; am § 160 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 65 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 121 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Revisor’s notes. —

The paragraphs added by ch. 121, SLA 1994 and ch. 64, SLA 2012 were renumbered to maintain the alphabetical order of the terms defined.

In 2016, in (8)(A) of this section, “AS

11.66.280

(10)” was substituted for “AS

11.66.280

(9)” to reflect the 2016 renumbering of AS 11.66.280(9).

Cross references. —

For a saving clause relating to interpretation of the provisions of
ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 31,
ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For severability of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 32, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (7), substituted “11.71.030(a)(1), (2), or (4) - (8)” for “11.71.020(a), 11.71.030(a)(1) or (2)”.

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (10), substituted “11.66.130(a)(2)(A) or (D)” for “11.66.130(a)(1) or (4)”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, substituted “11.71.021, 11.71.030(a)(2) or (9)” for “11.71.030(a)(1), (2), or (4) — (8)” in (7).

Sec. 34.03.370.
Applicability.

After March 19, 1974, this chapter applies to any rental agreement, lease, or tenancy entered into, extended, or renewed by the payment of rent on or subsequent to that date.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)

Sec. 34.03.380.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act.”

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)